Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 7

Grant Anticipation Notes

9-21-701. Authorization for the issuance of grant anticipation notes.

The governing body of a local government, acting by resolution, is hereby authorized to issue and sell interest-bearing grant anticipation notes for public works projects secured solely by a pledge of moneys, which pledge shall not be less than the principal amount of such notes, to be received pursuant to a contract or agreement between a state or federal agency and the local government. The resolution shall not be effective until the contract or agreement between the state or federal agency and the local government has been executed by all parties to the contract or agreement. The sale of all interest-bearing grant anticipation notes shall first be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 7-1; 2010, ch. 868, § 61.

9-21-702. Terms of grant anticipation notes.

Grant anticipation notes shall be sold at not less than par value and accrued interest. Grant anticipation notes may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times, may bear interest at such rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be subject to such terms of redemption, without premium, at the option of the local government as grant funds become available for such purpose, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 7-2.

9-21-703. Method of sale of grant anticipation notes.

Grant anticipation notes may be sold in such manner either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 7-3.

9-21-704. Security for grant anticipation notes.

The principal of grant anticipation notes shall not be direct general obligations of the local government, and the local government shall have no authority to levy ad valorem taxes for the payment of the principal of such notes; provided, that interest on grant anticipation notes may be a general obligation of a local government, and the local government shall have the authority to levy ad valorem taxes for the payment of interest on such notes. When the grant anticipation notes are issued and sold, they shall be secured solely by a pledge of moneys, which pledge shall not be less than the principal amount of such notes, to be received pursuant to a contract or agreement between a state or federal agency and the local government. Nothing herein shall preclude a local government from issuing capital outlay notes or bond anticipation notes in conjunction with grant anticipation notes issued under this section; provided, that the proceeds from the sale of any such capital outlay notes or bond anticipation notes shall not be applied to the payment of such grant anticipation notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 7-4.

9-21-705. Duration — Extension or renewal.

Grant anticipation notes shall be issued for a period not to exceed three (3) years from the date of issuance; provided, that the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may initially approve, or subsequently approve, a maturity date of such notes of not more than seven (7) years from the date of issuance, and may additionally approve a further extension or renewal not to exceed ten (10) years from the date of issuance upon application from the local government, by resolution, certifying that at least ten percent (10%) of the moneys anticipated to be received under the contract or agreement between such state or federal agency and the local government is not expected to be received within seven (7) years following the date of issuance of the notes.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 7-5; 1987, ch. 77, § 11; 2010, ch. 868, § 62.